src/morphology/affixes/gamig.lexc
LEXICON SECONDARY_NOUN_FINALS
+NI:win # ; !base = VAI
+NI:gan # ; !base = VAI
+NI:gamigo # ; !base = VAI, NA, NI ... sometimes has 'extensional-w' and lengthens preceding vowel
+NA:nini # ; !base = VAI, NA, NI ... sometimes has 'extensional-w' and lengthens preceding vowel
+NA:kwe # ; !base = VAI, NA, NI ... sometimes lengthens preceding vowel (extensional w)?

LEXICON SECONDARY_VII_FINALS
+VII:magad # ; !base = ?, lengthens preceding vowel
+VII:igaade # ; !base = VTA (VAI observed too), need to be careful with [i] (could be epenthetic)

LEXICON SECONDARY_VAI_FINALS
+VAI:igaazo # ; !base = VTA (VAI observed too), need to be careful with [i] (could be epenthetic)
